Maryland, session 2025, HB0730.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
1–101.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0730*

HOUSE BILL 730
(dd–1) “Online platform” means any public–facing website, web application, or digital
application, including a social network, ad network, or search engine, that:
(1) has 100,000 or more unique monthly United States visitors or users for
a majority of months during the immediately preceding 12 months; and
(2) receives payment for qualifying paid digital communications.
(ll–1) “Qualifying paid digital communication” means any electronic communication
that:
(1) is campaign material;
(2) is placed or promoted for a fee on an online platform;
(3) is disseminated to 500 or more individuals; and
(4) does not propose a commercial transaction.
13–405.
(a) (1) A person who directly [or indirectly requests placement of]
PURCHASES a qualifying paid digital communication [on] FROM an online platform shall
expressly notify the online platform [at the time the request for placement] BEFORE THE
PURCHASE of [a] THE qualifying paid digital communication [is made] that the
communication is a qualifying paid digital communication.
(2) The notice required under paragraph (1) of this subsection:
(i) shall be provided using the method prescribed by the online
platform; and
(ii) may not be provided through the inclusion of the authority line
required under § 13–401 of this subtitle on the qualifying paid digital communication.
(3) If an online platform does not provide a method for a [requester]
PURCHASER of a qualifying paid digital communication to give notice as required by
paragraph (2)(i) of this subsection, the [requester] PURCHASER shall:
(i) notify the State Board that the online platform is not in
compliance with paragraph (2)(i) of this subsection; and
(ii) provide the information required under subsection [(b)(6)] (B)(4)
of this section to the State Board.

HOUSE BILL 730 3
(b) (1) An online platform shall make available for public inspection on the
Internet in a machine–readable format the records described in paragraph [(6)] (4) of this
subsection regarding qualifying paid digital communications disseminated through the
online platform for which the online platform has received notice in accordance with
subsection (a) of this section.
(2) An online platform shall allow the public to search the records described
in paragraph [(6)] (4) of this subsection by [purchaser] THE PERSON WHO PAID FOR THE
QUALIFYING PAID DIGITAL COMMUNICATIONS, AS IDENTIFIED BY THE PURCHASER
OF EACH QUALIFYING PAID DIGITAL COMMUNICATION IN THE NOTICE UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
(3) [Except as provided in paragraph (5) of this subsection, the] THE
records described in paragraph [(6)] (4) of this subsection shall be available for public
inspection on the Internet [in a clearly identifiable location] on the online platform’s
website:
(i) [within 48 hours] AS SOON AS PRACTICABLE after [a] THE
ONLINE PLATFORM DISSEMINATED THE qualifying paid digital communication [is
purchased]; and
(ii) for at least 1 year after the general election following the date
when the online platform disseminated the qualifying paid digital communication to which
the records relate.
(4) [For purposes of paragraph (3) of this subsection, a person shall be
considered to have purchased a qualifying paid digital communication if the person has
executed a contract to purchase a qualifying paid digital communication.
(5) (i) An online platform may apply to the State Board for a compliance
waiver to allow the online platform to make the records described in paragraph (6) of this
subsection available for public inspection on the Internet within up to 7 days after a
qualifying paid digital communication is purchased.
(ii) The State Board shall require an applicant for a compliance
waiver under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph to:
1. describe why complying with the requirements under
paragraph (3) of this subsection presents an unreasonable burden on the applicant; and
2. present measures the applicant will take to meet the
requirements under paragraph (3) of this subsection within 6 months after the date the
compliance waiver is granted.
(iii) The State Board may not grant:

HOUSE BILL 730
1. more than one compliance waiver to an online platform;
and
2. a compliance waiver to an online platform within 30 days
before an election.
(iv) A compliance waiver is not effective during the 30 days
immediately preceding an election.
(v) If an online platform will apply for a compliance waiver under
subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, the online platform shall apply for the compliance
waiver before receiving payment for a qualifying paid digital communication.
(6)] For each qualifying paid digital communication [a purchaser requests
to disseminate] DISSEMINATED through an online platform and for which the purchaser
has provided notice in accordance with subsection (a) of this section, the online platform
shall maintain the following records:
(I) THE CANDIDATE OR BALLOT ISSUE TO WHICH THE
QUALIFYING PAID DIGITAL COMMUNICATION RELATES AND WHETHER THE
QUALIFYING PAID DIGITAL COMMUNICATION SUPPORTS OR OPPOSES THAT
CANDIDATE OR BALLOT ISSUE;
(II) THE DATES THAT THE QUALIFYING PAID DIGITAL
COMMUNICATION WAS FIRST DISSEMINATED AND LAST DISSEMINATED;
(III) A DIGITAL REPRESENTATION OF THE CONTENT OF THE
QUALIFYING PAID DIGITAL COMMUNICATION;
(IV) AN APPROXIMATE DESCRIPTION OF THE GEOGRAPHIC
LOCATIONS WHERE THE QUALIFYING PAID DIGITAL COMMUNICATION WAS
TARGETED;
(V) AN APPROXIMATE DESCRIPTION OF THE AUDIENCE THAT
WAS TARGETED TO RECEIVE THE QUALIFYING PAID DIGITAL COMMUNICATION;
(VI) THE APPROXIMATE NUMBER OF IMPRESSIONS GENERATED
BY THE QUALIFYING PAID DIGITAL COMMUNICATION;
[(i)] (VII) for each qualifying paid digital communication
[purchased] PAID FOR by a political committee:
1. the name of the person and any contact information for the
person required by the State Board, of the political committee;

HOUSE BILL 730 5
2. the treasurer of the political committee; and
3. the [total] APPROXIMATE amount paid by the purchaser
to the online platform for the placement of the qualifying paid digital communication; AND
[(ii)] (VIII) for each qualifying paid digital communication
[purchased] PAID FOR by a person other than a political committee [or an ad network]:
1. the name of the person and any contact information for the
person required by the State Board, of the person;
2. the identity of the individuals exercising direction or
control over the activities of the person, including the chief executive officer or board of
directors, if applicable; and
3. the [total] APPROXIMATE amount paid by the purchaser
to the online platform for the placement of the qualifying paid digital communication[; and
(iii) for each qualifying paid digital communication purchased by an
ad network:
1. the contact information for the ad network; or
2. a hyperlink to the ad network’s website where the contact
information is located].
[(c) (1) An online platform shall maintain and make available to the State
Board on request the records described in paragraph (3) of this subsection regarding
qualifying paid digital communications disseminated through the online platform for which
the online platform has received notice in accordance with subsection (a) of this section.
(2) The records described in paragraph (3) of this subsection shall be
available on the request of the State Board:
(i) within 48 hours after a qualifying paid digital communication is
first disseminated on the online platform; and
(ii) for at least 1 year after the general election following the date
when the online platform disseminated the qualifying paid digital communication to which
the records relate.
(3) For each qualifying paid digital communication a purchaser requests to
disseminate through an online platform and for which the purchaser has provided notice
in accordance with subsection (a) of this section, the online platform shall maintain the
following records:

HOUSE BILL 730
(i) the candidate or ballot issue to which the qualifying paid digital
communication relates and whether the qualifying paid digital communication supports or
opposes that candidate or ballot issue;
(ii) the dates and times that the qualifying paid digital
communication was first disseminated and last disseminated;
(iii) a digital copy of the content of the qualifying paid digital
communication;
(iv) an approximate description of the geographic locations where the
qualifying paid digital communication was disseminated;
(v) an approximate description of the audience that received or was
targeted to receive the qualifying paid digital communication; and
(vi) the total number of impressions generated by the qualifying paid
digital communication.
(4) Information obtained by the State Board under this subsection is not
subject to inspection under the Public Information Act.]
[(d)] (C) (1) A purchaser of a qualifying paid digital communication shall
provide the online platform that disseminates the qualifying paid digital communication
with the information necessary for the online platform to comply with [subsections]
SUBSECTION (b) [and (c)] of this section AND ANY UPDATES TO THE INFORMATION AS
NECESSARY.
(2) An online platform may rely in good faith on the information provided
by a purchaser of a qualifying paid digital communication to comply with [subsections]
SUBSECTION (b) [and (c)] of this section.
[(e)] (D) An online platform shall make reasonable efforts to allow the State
Board to:
(1) obtain the information required under [subsections] SUBSECTION (b)
[and (c)] of this section;
(2) obtain the information that a purchaser of a qualifying paid digital
communication provided to the online platform in accordance with subsection [(d)] (C) of
this section; and
(3) otherwise request that a purchaser of a qualifying paid digital
communication comply with this section or § 13–401 of this subtitle.

HOUSE BILL 730 7
[(f)] (E) An online platform that disseminates qualifying paid digital
communications shall make reasonable efforts, in accordance with the federal Stored
Communications Act, to comply with any subpoena that is issued in connection with an
investigation concerning the compliance of a purchaser of a qualifying paid digital
communication with this section or § 13–401 of this subtitle.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.